Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
Article 3 Employees’ Records Checks for Child Welfare Agencies
49-5-73.
Applicability of “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act”; consideration of matters in mitigation of conviction.

A determination by the department regarding preliminary or fingerprint records checks under this article, or any action by the department revoking, suspending, or refusing to grant or renew a license based upon such determination, shall constitute a contested case for purposes of Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” except that any hearing required to be held pursuant thereto may be held reasonably expeditiously after such determination or action by the department. It is expressly provided that upon motion from any party, the hearing officer may, in his discretion, consider matters in mitigation of any conviction, provided the hearing officer examines the circumstances of the case and makes an independent finding that no physical harm was done to a victim and also examines the character and employment history since the conviction and determines that there is no propensity for cruel behavior or behavior involving moral turpitude on the part of the person making a motion for an exception to sanctions normally imposed. If the hearing officer deems a hearing to be appropriate, he will also notify at least 30 days prior to such hearing the office of the prosecuting attorney who initiated the prosecution of the case in question in order to allow the prosecutor to object to a possible determination that the conviction would not be a bar for the grant or continuation of a license or employment as contemplated within this title. If objections are made, the hearing officer will take such objections into consideration in considering the case.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 1397, § 1; Code 1981, §

49-5-73

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1605, § 2.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1, redesignated former Code Section 49-5-73 as Code Section 49-5-72 and former Code Section 49-5-74 as this Code section.

49-5-74.
Administration of article.

The department is authorized to provide by regulation for the administration of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-74

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1.

Editor’s notes.

Former Code Section 49-5-74 was redesignated as Code Section 49-5-73 by Ga. L. 1985, p. 963, § 1.